apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="alfabetet__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="parlament__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fjernsyn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="antal__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rum__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>met</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="materiale__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nerverne__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anklerne__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="klub__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>berne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ber</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ben</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hatten__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sko__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sten__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fejl__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="grund__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fugl__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="halvdel__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kammerat__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ernes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <i>antal</i>
        <par n="antal__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>begreb</i>
        <par n="bad__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>beregningen</l>
          <r>beregning</r>
        </p>
        <par n="alfabetet__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>blod</i>
        <par n="bad__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bouillonen</l>
          <r>bouillon</r>
        </p>
        <par n="alfabetet__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>bryst</i>
        <par n="bad__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>demokrati</i>
        <par n="bad__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>drama</i>
        <par n="bad__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fad</i>
        <par n="bad__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fejl</i>
        <par n="fejl__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fjernsyn</i>
        <par n="fjernsyn__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>flippen</l>
          <r>flip</r>
        </p>
        <par n="alfabetet__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fugl</i>
        <par n="fugl__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>grund</i>
        <par n="grund__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>gulv</i>
        <par n="bad__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>halvdel</i>
        <par n="halvdel__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hanen</l>
          <r>hane</r>
        </p>
        <par n="alfabetet__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hatten</l>
          <r>hat</r>
        </p>
        <par n="hatten__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hegn</i>
        <par n="bad__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hofterne</l>
          <r>hofte</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklerne__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hund</i>
        <par n="grund__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indbydelsen</l>
          <r>indbydelse</r>
        </p>
        <par n="alfabetet__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>kammerat</i>
        <par n="kammerat__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>klub</i>
        <par n="klub__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>knallerterne</l>
          <r>knallert</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklerne__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>krystallerne</l>
          <r>krystal</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklerne__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lavinen</l>
          <r>lavine</r>
        </p>
        <par n="alfabetet__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lungerne</l>
          <r>lunge</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklerne__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>lyd</i>
        <par n="grund__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>materiale</i>
        <par n="materiale__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>mod</i>
        <par n="bad__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>munkene</l>
          <r>munk</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklerne__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nerverne</l>
          <r>nerve</r>
        </p>
        <par n="nerverne__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovnen</l>
          <r>ovn</r>
        </p>
        <par n="alfabetet__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>parlament</i>
        <par n="parlament__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>puklen</l>
          <r>pukkel</r>
        </p>
        <par n="alfabetet__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rekrutterne</l>
          <r>rekrut</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklerne__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>rum</i>
        <par n="rum__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>salg</i>
        <par n="bad__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>sko</i>
        <par n="sko__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>skruerne</l>
          <r>skrue</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklerne__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>slagteren</l>
          <r>slagter</r>
        </p>
        <par n="alfabetet__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>spanierne</l>
          <r>spanier</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklerne__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>spark</i>
        <par n="bad__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>sten</i>
        <par n="sten__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>tilstand</i>
        <par n="grund__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ting</i>
        <par n="fejl__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>transporten</l>
          <r>transport</r>
        </p>
        <par n="alfabetet__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>videnskabsmændene</l>
          <r>videnskabsmand</r>
        </p>
        <par n="anklerne__n"/>
      </e>
